fr: Fonctionnalités supplémentaires du logiciel d’animation: Animation 2D; Animation 3D; Animation de personnages; Animation pédagogique; Graphiques animés; Stop motion; Effets visuels; Autre
cs: Další vlastnosti animačního softwaru: 2D animace; 3D animace; Animace postav; Vzdělávací animace; Pohyblivá grafika; Zastavení pohybu; Vizuální efekty; Jiné
es: Características adicionales del software de animación: Animación 2D; Animación 3D; Animación de personajes; Animación educativa; Gráficos en movimiento; Stop motion; Efectos visuales; Otros
de: Zusätzliche Funktionen der Animationssoftware: 2D-Animation; 3D-Animation; Charakteranimation; Pädagogische Animation; Bewegungsgrafiken; Stopp-Motion; Visuelle Effekte; Sonstiges
ko: 추가 애니메이션 소프트웨어 기능: 2D 애니메이션; 3D 애니메이션; 캐릭터 애니메이션; 교육용 애니메이션; 모션 그래픽; 스톱모션; 시각 효과; 기타
hr-HR: Dodatne značajke softvera za animaciju: 2D animacija; 3D animacija; Animacija likova; Edukativna animacija; Pokretna grafika; Stop-animacija; Vizualni efekti; Ostalo
pt-PT: Características adicionais de software de animação: Animação 2D; Animação 3D; Animação de personagens; Animação educativa; Gráficos em movimento; Paragem de movimento; Efeitos visuais; Outro
ro-RO: Funcții suplimentare software pentru animație: Animație 2D; Animație 3D; Animație cu personaje; Animație educațională; Grafică de mișcare; Stop cadru; Efecte vizuale; Altele
el: Πρόσθετες δυνατότητες λογισμικού κινουμένων σχεδίων: Δισδιάστατες κινούμενες εικόνες; Τρισδιάστατες κινούμενες εικόνες; Κινούμενες εικόνες χαρακτήρων; Εκπαιδευτικές κινούμενες εικόνες; Γραφικά κίνησης; Τεχνική καρέ-καρέ; Οπτικά εφέ; Άλλο
pt-BR: Recursos adicionais de software de animação: Animação 2D; Animação 3D; Animação de personagens; Animação educativa; Gráficos em movimento; Stop motion; Efeitos visuais; Outro
vi: Các tính năng phần mềm hoạt hình bổ sung: Hoạt hình 2D; Hoạt hình 3D; Hoạt hình nhân vật; Hoạt hình giáo dục; Đồ họa chuyển động; Stop motion; Hiệu ứng hình ảnh; Khác
th: คุณลักษณะเพิ่มเติมของซอฟต์แวร์แอนิเมชัน: แอนิเมชัน 2 มิติ; แอนิเมชัน 3 มิติ; แอนิเมชันของตัวละคร; แอนิเมชันเพื่อการศึกษา; กราฟิกเคลื่อนไหว; สต็อปโมชัน; เอฟเฟ็กต์ภาพ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Papildomos animacijos programinės įrangos funkcijos: 2D animacija; 3D animacija; Veikėjų animacija; Mokomoji animacija; Judesio grafika; Sustabdytas kadras; Specialieji efektai; Kita
sk-SK: Ďalšie funkcie animačného softvéru: 2D animácia; 3D animácia; Animácia postavy; Vzdelávacia animácia; Pohybová grafika; Fázová animácia; Vizuálne efekty; Iné
hu: Animációs szoftver további funkciói: 2D animáció; 3D animáció; Karakteranimáció; Oktatási animáció; Mozgógrafika; Stop motion; Vizuális effektusok; Egyéb
sv: Ytterligare detaljer för programvara för animering: 2D-animationer; 3D-animationer; Karaktärsanimation; Pedagogisk animation; Rörlig grafik; Stop motion; Visuella effekter; Övrigt
sl-SI: Dodatne funkcije programske opreme za animacijo: 2D animacija; 3D animacija; Animacija likov; Poučna animacija; Gibljiva grafika; Stop animacija; Vizualni učinki; Drugo
pl: Dodatkowe funkcje oprogramowania do animacji: Animacja 2D; Animacja 3D; Animacja postaci; Animacja edukacyjna; Grafika ruchoma; Animacja poklatkowa; Efekty wizualne; Inne
da: Yderligere funktioner for animationssoftware: 2D-animation; 3D-animation; Karakteranimation; Animation til undervisningsbrug; Motion Graphics; Stop-motion; Visuelle effekter; Andet
nb: Tilleggsfunksjoner for animasjonsprogramvare: 2D-animasjon; 3D-animasjon; Karakteranimasjon; Pedagogisk animasjon; Motiongrafikk; Stop motion; Visuelle effekter; Annet
tr: Ek animasyon yazılımı özellikleri: 2D Animasyonlar; 3D Animasyonlar; Karakter animasyonu; Eğitici animasyon; Hareketli Grafikler; Stop motion; Görsel Efektler; Diğer
it: Funzionalità aggiuntive del software di animazione: Animazione 2D; Animazione 3D; Animazione dei personaggi; Animazione educativa; Grafica in movimento; Interrompere il movimento; Effetti visivi; Altro
ja: アニメーションソフトウェアの追加機能: 2Dアニメーション; 3Dアニメーション; キャラクターアニメーション; 教育用アニメーション; モーショングラフィックス; ストップモーション; ビジュアルエフェクト; その他
ru: Дополнительные функции программного обеспечения для работы с анимацией: 2D-анимация; 3D-анимация; Анимация персонажей; Обучающая анимация; Анимированная графика; Покадровая киносъемка; Визуальные эффекты; Другое
zh-CN: 其他动画软件功能: 2D 动画; 3D 动画; 角色动画; 教育动画; 动态图形; 定格; 视觉效果; 其他
bg-BG: Допълнителни функции на софтуера за анимация: 2D анимация; 3D анимация; Анимация на герои; Образователна анимация; Моушън графики; Стоп-моушън; Специални ефекти; Други
en: Additional animation software features: 2D animation; 3D animation; Character animation; Educational animation; Motion graphics; Stop motion; Visual effects; Other
fi: Animaatioohjelmiston lisäominaisuudet: 2D-animaatio; 3D-animaatio; Hahmoanimaatio; Koulutusanimaatio; Liikegrafiikka; Stop motion; Visuaalinen tehoste; Muu
nl: Extra functies voor animatiesoftware: 2D-animatie; 3D-animatie; Karakter animatie; Educatieve animatie; Bewegende beelden; Stop motion; Visuele effecten; Andere
zh-TW: 附加動畫軟體功能: 2D 動畫; 3D 動畫; 人物動畫; 教育動畫; 動態圖形; 定格動畫; 視覺效果; 其他